District of Columbia statutes.
42-3141.02

Nuisance.

Graffiti is a nuisance and the owner of the property on which the graffiti is located shall abate the graffiti or authorize the Mayor to abate the graffiti as provided for in § 42-3141.03.

Sept. 18, 2010, D.C. Law 18-219, § 3, 57 DCR 4353
This section is referenced in § 42-3141.05 and § 42-3141.11.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Anti-Graffiti Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-389, May 5, 2010, 57 DCR 4332).